Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.270

Filing of notice and affidavit of publication required.

Promptly after publication of the notices prescribed in RCW 32.32.265, the applicant shall file with the director the notice and affidavit of publication from each newspaper publisher in the manner the director shall require.

[ 1994 c 92 s 373; 1981 c 85 s 53.]